Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 2. Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act

§ 34-14-201.
Short title.

This act [§§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

] may be cited as the “Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act.”

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 55 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 34-14-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

]:

“Affiliate” means:

A person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, twenty percent (20%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person who holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole discretionary power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not exercised the power to vote.

A corporation twenty percent (20%) or more of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held with power to vote, by the debtor or a person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with the power to vote, twenty percent (20%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a person who holds the securities:

As a fiduciary or agent without sole power to vote the securities; or

Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not in fact exercised the power to vote.

A person whose business is operated by the debtor under a lease or other agreement, or a person substantially all of whose assets are controlled by the debtor; or

A person who operates the debtor’s business under a lease or other agreement or controls substantially all of the debtor’s assets.

“Asset” means property of a debtor, but the term does not include:

Property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid lien;

Property to the extent it is generally exempt under nonbankruptcy law; or

An interest in property held in tenancy by the entireties to the extent it is not subject to process by a creditor holding a claim against only one (1) tenant.

“Claim” means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured or unsecured;

“Creditor” means a person who has a claim;

“Debt” means liability on a claim;

“Debtor” means a person who is liable on a claim;

“Insider” includes:

If the debtor is an individual:

A relative of the debtor or of a general partner of the debtor;

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in subdivision (A)(II) of this paragraph;

A corporation of which the debtor is a director, officer or person in control;

An incorporated business organization, other than a partnership, in which the debtor is a member, partner, manager or other participant, when the debtor’s participation includes the right to conduct the business of the organization or the debtor controls the organization; or

An individual, as described in subdivision (A)(I) of this paragraph, who participates in an unincorporated business organization, other than a partnership, and who has the right to conduct the business of the organization or who controls the organization.

If the debtor is a corporation:

A director of the debtor;

An officer of the debtor;

A person in control of the debtor;

A partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in subdivision (A)(IV) of this paragraph; or

A relative of a general partner, director, officer or person in control of the debtor.

If the debtor is a partnership:

A general partner in the debtor;

A relative of a general partner in or a general partner of, or a person in control of the debtor;

Another partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;

A general partner in a partnership described in subdivision (C)(III) of this paragraph; or

A person in control of the debtor.

An affiliate, or an insider of an affiliate as if the affiliate were the debtor;

A managing agent of the debtor; and

If the debtor is an unincorporated business organization other than a partnership:

A member, partner, manager or participant who has the right to conduct business of the organization;

A person who controls the organization; or

A relative of a person described in subdivision (F)(I) and (F)(II).

“Lien” means a charge against or an interest in property to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, and includes a security interest created by agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings, a common-law lien or a statutory lien;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership;

“Relative” means an individual related by consanguinity within the third degree as determined by the common law, a spouse, or an individual related to a spouse within the third degree as so determined, and includes an individual in an adoptive relationship within the third degree;

“Transfer” means every mode, direct or indirect, absolute or conditional, voluntary or involuntary, of disposing of or parting with an asset or an interest in an asset, and includes payment of money, release, lease and creation of a lien or other encumbrance;

“Valid lien” means a lien that is effective against the holder of a judicial lien subsequently obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Exclusion of certain property from “assets.” —

This section excludes all property which is exempt from liability for debts from the assets of the debtor. Wantulok v. Wantulok, 67 Wyo. 22, 214 P.2d 477, 223 P.2d 1030,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1950).(Decided under prior law)

§ 34-14-203.
Insolvency.

A debtor is insolvent if the sum of the debtor’s debt is greater than all of the debtor’s assets, at a fair valuation.

A debtor who is generally not paying his debts as they become due is presumed to be insolvent.

A partnership is insolvent under subsection (a) of this section if the sum of the partnership’s debts is greater than the aggregate of all of the partnership’s assets, at a fair valuation, and the sum of the excess of the value of each general partner’s nonpartnership assets over the partner’s nonpartnership debts.

Assets under this section do not include property that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay or defraud creditors or that has been transferred in a manner making the transfer voidable under this act [§§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

].

Debts under this section do not include an obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on property of the debtor not included as an asset.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

Prima facie showing of insolvency of grantor. —

The uncontroverted allegation in plaintiff's petition to set aside a fraudulent conveyance that an execution against grantor's property was returned “wholly unsatisfied” constituted a prima facie showing of the insolvency of the grantor. Glover v. Berger, 75 Wyo. 191, 294 P.2d 793,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1956).(Decided under prior law.)

§ 34-14-204.
Value.

Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in exchange for the transfer or obligation, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied, but value does not include an unperformed promise made otherwise than in the ordinary course of the promisor’s business to furnish support to the debtor or another person.

For the purposes of W.S. 34-14-205(a)(ii) and

34-14-206

, a person gives a reasonably equivalent value if the person acquires an interest of the debtor in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted, noncollusive foreclosure sale or execution of a power of sale for the acquisition or disposition of the interest of the debtor upon default under a mortgage, deed of trust or security agreement.

A transfer is made for present value if the exchange between the debtor and the transferee is intended by them to be contemporaneous and is in fact substantially contemporaneous.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

Allegation as to consideration in petition to set aside conveyance. —

Plaintiff in a petition to set aside a fraudulent conveyance stated that “said conveyances were made without consideration, or if any consideration was passed, the same was disproportionate to the value of the property.” It was held that both alternatives were good in substance and were not subject to a general demurrer, though they were possibly vulnerable to special demurrer or motion. Glover v. Berger, 75 Wyo. 191, 294 P.2d 793,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1956).(Decided under prior law.).

Transfer of funds into annuity contracts. —

Debtors did not receive fair consideration when they took all of their available unencumbered assets, reduced them to cash, and purchased annuity contracts which they claimed as exempt; from the perspective of their creditors, they received no consideration in return. Royal v. Baker (In re Baker), 273 B.R. 892, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 130 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 2002).

§ 34-14-205.
Transfers fraudulent as to present and future creditors.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is fraudulent as to a creditor, whether the creditor’s claim arose before or after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred, if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation:

With actual intent to hinder, delay or defraud any creditor of the debtor; or

Without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation, and the debtor:

Was engaged or was about to engage in a business or a transaction for which the remaining assets of the debtor were unreasonably small in relation to the business or transaction; or

Intended to incur, or believed or reasonably should have believed that he would incur, debts beyond his ability to pay as they became due.

In determining actual intent under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, consideration may be given, among other factors, to whether:

The transfer or obligation was to an insider;

The debtor retained possession or control of the property transferred after the transfer;

The transfer or obligation was disclosed or concealed;

Before the transfer was made or obligation was incurred, the debtor had been sued or threatened with suit;

The transfer was of substantially all the debtor’s assets;

The debtor absconded;

The debtor removed or concealed assets;

The value of the consideration received by the debtor was reasonably equivalent to the value of the asset transferred or the amount of the obligation incurred;

The debtor was insolvent or became insolvent shortly after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred;

The transfer occurred shortly before or shortly after a substantial debt was incurred; and

The debtor transferred the essential assets of the business to a lienor who transferred the assets to an insider of the debtor.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

No evidence showing insolvency. —

Husband, an alleged creditor of deceased wife, could not set aside conveyances of the wife to the defendant for fraud due to inadequacy of consideration, where husband did not produce a scintilla of evidence as to whether or not the deceased left any property aside from that which she conveyed. Strom v. Felton, 76 Wyo. 370, 302 P.2d 917,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1956). (Decided under prior law.)

Evidence supported conclusion finding fraudulent transfer. —

Trial court's consideration of the elements of (former) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 34-14-105 and resulting conclusion that a transfer of real property from a judgment debtor to a company was fraudulent was not clearly erroneous. Dev-Tech Corp. v. Wilson, Miller, Barton & Peek, Inc., 2004 WY 163, 102 P.3d 880,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 2004). (Decided under prior law.)

Finding that quitclaim deeds from a corporate owner to the corporation, and from the corporation to the corporation and another corporate owner, were fraudulent conveyances was not erroneous because the first corporate owner conceded that the deeds were recorded with intent to defraud a previous owner of the property in question.
W. Am. Hous. Corp. v. Pearson, 2007 WY 184, 171 P.3d 539,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 2007).

Because the purported transfer of title and/or an interest in certain property to a trust was intended to hinder, delay or defraud the United States of America from collecting present and future taxes, the transfer was fraudulent and of no effect as to the United States.
2010 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 141819.

Evidence did not support conclusion finding fraudulent transfer. —

Transferee was liable to debtor for unpaid invoices pursuant to
11 U.S.C.S. §
542(b), but did not raise sufficient allegations to
support claims for avoidable or fraudulent transfers pursuant to
11 U.S.C.S. §§ 544(b), 548(a), and
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

34-14-205

.
MARMC Transp. Inc. v. Monster Heavy Haulers, LLC (In re MARMC Transp. Inc.), 2012 Bankr. LEXIS 5295 (Bankr. D. Wyo. Nov. 13, 2012).

Actual fraud is requisite

to fraudulent conveyance. Hinton v. Saul, 37 Wyo. 78, 259 P. 185,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1927). (Decided under prior law.)

Proof of actual fraud. —

Proof of intent to hinder or delay creditors is proof of actual fraud within statute regarding vacating of conveyance made with actual intent to defraud. Hofmann v. La Fontaine, 16 F. Supp. 748, 1936 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1863 (D. Wyo. 1936). (Decided under prior law.)

An intent to “hinder or delay” is sufficient to void a transfer

even though there is no actual fraud as contemplated following the disjunctive “or.” In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977). (Decided under prior law.)

Therefore, proof of actual fraud, as provided in the alternative, is not necessary

where there is an intent to “hinder or delay.” In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977). (Decided under prior law.)

A single badge of fraud may stamp a transaction as fraudulent.

In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977). (Decided under prior law.)

Multiple badges of fraud. —

In a divorce case, where multiple “badges of fraud” accompanied a husband's transfers of assets to a family trust in the Bahamas, including his complete control over trust assets, and his creation of the trust after he separated and reconciled with his wife, the trial court's finding that the husband's intent in making such transfers was to hinder, delay, or defraud his creditors and his wife was not clearly erroneous. Breitenstine v. Breitenstine, 2003 WY 16, 62 P.3d 587,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2003). (Decided under prior law.)

It is not necessary to prove a fraudulent conveyance by direct evidence,

circumstantial evidence being sufficient. In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977). (Decided under prior law.)

Burden of going forward with evidence of valuable consideration. —

Where badges of fraud are established to prove actual intent, the burden of going forward with evidence of valuable consideration is on the party seeking to uphold the conveyance as against the claim of an attacking creditor. In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977). (Decided under prior law.)

Transfer by renunciation held fraudulent. —

Where a legatee renounced the bequest to him under the will of the testatrix following the filing of the executor's final account and petition for distribution, on the same date that a creditor had obtained a judgment against him, the transfer by renunciation was a fraudulent conveyance as a matter of law under this section. In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977). (Decided under prior law.)

Evidence supported conclusion finding fraudulent transfer. —

Because the purported transfer of title and/or an interest in certain property to a trust was intended to hinder, delay or defraud the United States of America from collecting present and future taxes, the transfer was fraudulent and of no effect as to the United States.
2010 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 141819.

Evidence did not support conclusion finding fraudulent transfer.—

Several payments made by an insider creditor after three brothers took over an LLC’s management were not fraudulent where the LLC received reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfers, and new value was given. Mantle v. North Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 29, 437 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2019).

Sale of property was not fraudulent where the district court considered factors that can serve as circumstantial evidence of actual intent, and there was no antecedent debt. Mantle v. North Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 29, 437 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence supported conclusion finding fraudulent transfer.—

Payments to one manager were fraudulent where it was not clear that the pledge fund transfers to the manager could have accomplished anything of value to the LLC when made in 2015, and the district court adequately explained why the ordinary course of business defense did not apply. Mantle v. North Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 29, 437 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2019).

Payments to an LLC manager were not fraudulent because they were reimbursements for the LLC’s legal fees and payroll expenses, but other payments to him were fraudulent transfers because the LLC did not receive reasonably equivalent value in exchange for them; those transfers consisted of reimbursements for 2013 pledge funds and payments towards the manager’s 2013 LLC tax obligation. Mantle v. North Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 29, 437 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 34-14-206.
Transfers fraudulent as to present creditors.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is fraudulent as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation and the debtor was insolvent at that time or the debtor became insolvent as a result of the transfer or obligation.

A transfer made by a debtor is fraudulent as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made if the transfer was made to an insider for an antecedent debt, the debtor was insolvent at that time, and the insider had reasonable cause to believe that the debtor was insolvent.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

Evidence supported conclusion finding fraudulent transfer.—

Evidence did not support conclusion finding fraudulent transfer.—

Evidence supported conclusion finding fraudulent transfer.—

Payments to an LLC manager were not fraudulent because they were reimbursements for the LLC’s legal fees and payroll expenses, but other payments to him were fraudulent transfers because the LLC did not receive reasonably equivalent value in exchange for them; those transfers consisted of reimbursements for 2013 pledge funds and payments towards the manager’s 2013 LLC tax obligation. Mantle v. North Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 29, 437 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence did not support conclusion finding fraudulent transfer.—

Sale of property was not fraudulent where the district court considered factors that can serve as circumstantial evidence of actual intent, and there was no antecedent debt. Mantle v. North Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 29, 437 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 34-14-207.
When transfer is made or obligation is incurred.

For purposes of this act [§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

]:

A transfer is made:

With respect to an asset that is real property other than a fixture, but including the interest of a seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a good-faith purchaser of the asset from the debtor against whom applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is superior to the interest of the transferee; and

With respect to an asset that is not real property or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a judicial lien otherwise than under this act that is superior to the interest of the transferee.

If applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected as provided in subsection (a) of this section and the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of an action for relief under this act, the transfer is deemed made immediately before the commencement of the action.

If applicable law does not permit the transfer to be perfected as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the transfer is made when it becomes effective between the debtor and the transferee.

A transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired rights in the asset transferred.

An obligation is incurred:

If oral, when it becomes effective between the parties; or

If evidenced by a writing, when the writing executed by the obligor is delivered to or for the benefit of the obligee.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

§ 34-14-208.
Remedies of creditors.

In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this act [§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

], a creditor, subject to the limitations in W.S.

34-14-209

, may obtain:

Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim;

An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedure prescribed by law;

Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of the other property of the transferee; or

Any other relief the circumstances may require.

If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

Attachment. —

Ordinarily a creditor cannot attach property rightfully in custody of his deceased debtor's administrator, but this rule cannot apply where the debtor is living and the creditor attaches property fraudulently transferred by debtor to one who died while in possession of the property. Flaks, Inc. v. De Berry, 53 Wyo. 203, 79 P.2d 825,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1938). (Decided under prior law.)

Rights against administrator. —

An administrator in possession of property conveyed to his intestate in fraud of creditors stands in the shoes of the deceased vendee and takes only what his intestate held at his death. Flaks, Inc. v. De Berry, 53 Wyo. 203, 79 P.2d 825,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1938) (Decided under prior law.)

§ 34-14-209.
Defenses, liability and protection of transferee.

A transfer or obligation is not voidable under W.S. 34-14-205(a)(i) against a person who took in good faith and for a reasonably equivalent value or against any subsequent transferee or obligee.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, to the extent a transfer is voidable in an action by a creditor under W.S. 34-14-208(a)(i), the creditor may recover judgment for the value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under subsection (c) of this section, or the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim, whichever is less. The judgment may be entered against:

The first transferee of the asset or the person for whose benefit the transfer was made; or

Any subsequent transferee other than a good-faith transferee or obligee who took for value or from any subsequent transferee or obligee.

If the judgment under subsection (b) of this section is based upon the value of the asset transferred, the judgment must be for an amount equal to the value of the asset at the time of the transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.

Notwithstanding voidability of a transfer or an obligation under this act [§§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

], a good-faith transferee or obligee is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor for the transfer or obligation, to:

A lien on or a right to retain any interest in the asset transferred;

Enforcement of any obligation incurred; or

A reduction in the amount of the liability on the judgment.

A transfer is not voidable under W.S. 34-14-205(a)(ii) or

34-14-206

if the transfer results from:

Termination of a lease upon default by the debtor when the termination is pursuant to the lease and applicable law; or

Enforcement of a security interest in compliance with article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code.

A transfer is not voidable under W.S. 34-14-206(b):

To the extent the insider gave a new value to or for the benefit of the debtor after the transfer was made unless the new value was secured by a valid lien;

If made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the debtor and the insider; or

If made pursuant to a good-faith effort to rehabilitate the debtor and the transfer secured present value given for that purpose as well as an antecedent debt of the debtor.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

§ 34-14-210.
Extinguishment of claim for relief.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a claim for relief with respect to a fraudulent transfer or obligation under this act is extinguished unless an action is brought:

Under W.S. 34-14-205(a)(i), within two (2) years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, within six (6) months after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

Under W.S. 34-14-205(a)(ii) or 34-14-206(a), within two (2) years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

Under W.S. 34-14-206(b), within six (6) months after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

A claim for relief with respect to a fraudulent transfer or obligation under this act involving qualified transfers to a qualified spendthrift trust as provided by W.S.

4-10-510

through

4-10-515

or involving transfers to an irrevocable discretionary trust, provided that the trustee may only make discretionary distributions under W.S. 4-10-506(c), is extinguished unless an action is brought:

With respect to a creditor known to the settlor, one hundred twenty (120) days after the date on which notice of the transfer is mailed to the creditor, provided that the notice states:

The name and address of the settlor or the settlor’s representative and the name and address of the trustee or the trustee’s representative;

That assets were transferred to a qualified spendthrift trust or to an irrevocable trust where the trustee can only make discretionary distributions; and

That the creditor is required to initiate an action against the settlor and the trustee within one hundred twenty (120) days from the mailing of the notice or the claim is forever barred.

With respect to a creditor not known to the settlor, one hundred twenty (120) days after the date on which notice of the transfer is first published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the settlor resides, provided that the notice includes the information required in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, within the later of two (2) years after the transfer is made or six (6) months after the transfer is or reasonably could have been discovered by the creditor if the creditor can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the creditor asserted a specific claim against the settlor before the transfer.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1; 2021 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), added "Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section," at the beginning, "an" preceding "action" and made a related change; in (a)(i), substituted "two (2)" for "four (4)" and "six (6) months" for "one (1) year"; in (a)(ii), substituted "34-14-205(a)(ii) " for "31-14-205(a)(ii)" and "two (2)" for "four (4)"; substituted "six (6) months" for "one (1) year" in (a)(iii); and added (b).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "34-14-205(a)(ii)" for "31-14-205(a)(ii)" in (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 50, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply to causes of action involving fraudulent transfers that accrue on or after the effective date of this act.”

Cited in

Baker v. Speaks, 2014 WY 117,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Sept. 18, 2014).

§ 34-14-211.
Supplementary provisions.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this act [§§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

], the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement its provisions.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.

§ 34-14-212.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This act [§§

34-14-201

through

34-14-212

] shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this act among states enacting it.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 55, § 1.